Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.676] SIRVA PREVENTION ACTIVITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "shoulder injury related to vaccine administration" or "SIRVA" has the meaning given in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 100.3(c)(10). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin SIRVA prevention poster. new text end new text begin All health clinics, pharmacies, and other health care settings where vaccines are administered must display a poster created or approved by the commissioner of health that describes proper vaccine administration techniques to prevent shoulder injury related to vaccine administration. The poster must be displayed at one or more locations in the clinic, pharmacy, or health care setting where the poster is visible to the public and all health care personnel authorized to administer vaccines at the clinic, pharmacy, or health care setting. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Training. new text end new text begin In order to administer vaccines on or after July 1, 2026, health care personnel otherwise authorized to administer vaccines must complete comprehensive, competency-based training on vaccine administration. The training must conform with the guidance of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention on vaccine administration and must at least address vaccine preparation, proper needle selection, site and route selection, administration, and SIRVA as a potentially serious complication resulting from improper vaccine administration. After completing the training, health care personnel must submit evidence of completion to the health-related licensing board that regulates the health care personnel. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to veterinary clinics, veterinary hospitals, licensed veterinarians, or licensed veterinary technicians. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.055, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Qualified dentists. (a) The vaccine shall be administered only to eligible patients 16 years of age and older and only by licensed dentists who: (1) have immediate access to emergency response equipment, including but not limited to oxygen administration equipment, epinephrine, and other allergic reaction response equipment; and (2) are trained in or have successfully completed an educational program on vaccine administration that is approved by the Minnesota Board of Dentistry, specifically for the administration of vaccines. The training or program mustnew text begin comply with the requirements in section 145.676, subdivision 3, and mustnew text end include: (i) educational material on the disease and vaccination as prevention of the disease; (ii) contraindications and precautions; (iii) intramuscular administration; (iv) communication of risk and benefits of vaccination and legal requirements involved; (v) reporting of adverse events; (vi) documentation required by federal law; and (vii) storage and handling of vaccines. (b) Any dentist giving vaccinations under this section shall comply with guidelines established by the federal Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices relating to vaccines and immunizations, which includes, but is not limited to, vaccine storage and handling, vaccine administration and documentation, and vaccine contraindications and precautions. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.01, subdivision 27, is amended to read: Subd. 27. Practice of pharmacy. "Practice of pharmacy" means: (1) interpretation and evaluation of prescription drug orders; (2) compounding, labeling, and dispensing drugs and devices (except labeling by a manufacturer or packager of nonprescription drugs or commercially packaged legend drugs and devices); (3) participation in clinical interpretations and monitoring of drug therapy for assurance of safe and effective use of drugs, including ordering and performing laboratory tests that are waived under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act of 1988, United States Code, title 42, section 263a et seq. A pharmacist may collect specimens, interpret results, notify the patient of results, and refer the patient to other health care providers for follow-up care and may initiate, modify, or discontinue drug therapy only pursuant to a protocol or collaborative practice agreement. A pharmacist may delegate the authority to administer tests under this clause to a pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern. A pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern may perform tests authorized under this clause if the technician or intern is working under the direct supervision of a pharmacist; (4) participation in drug and therapeutic device selection; drug administration for first dosage and medical emergencies; intramuscular and subcutaneous drug administration under a prescription drug order; drug regimen reviews; and drug or drug-related research; (5) drug administration, through intramuscular and subcutaneous administration used to treat mental illnesses as permitted under the following conditions: (i) upon the order of a prescriber and the prescriber is notified after administration is complete; or (ii) pursuant to a protocol or collaborative practice agreement as defined by section 151.01, subdivisions 27b and 27c, and participation in the initiation, management, modification, administration, and discontinuation of drug therapy is according to the protocol or collaborative practice agreement between the pharmacist and a dentist, optometrist, physician, physician assistant, podiatrist, or veterinarian, or an advanced practice registered nurse authorized to prescribe, dispense, and administer under section 148.235. Any changes in drug therapy or medication administration made pursuant to a protocol or collaborative practice agreement must be documented by the pharmacist in the patient's medical record or reported by the pharmacist to a practitioner responsible for the patient's care; (6) initiating, ordering, and administering influenza and COVID-19 or SARS-CoV-2 vaccines authorized or approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to all eligible individuals three years of age and older and all other United States Food and Drug Administration-approved vaccines to patients six years of age and older according to the federal Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices recommendations. new text begin A pharmacist administering vaccines under this clause must have completed training that complies with the requirements in section 145.676, subdivision 3. new text end A pharmacist may delegate the authority to administer vaccines under this clause to a pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern who has completed training in vaccine administration new text begin that complies with the requirements in section 145.676, subdivision 3, new text end if: (i) the pharmacist and the pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern have successfully completed a program approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education (ACPE) specifically for the administration of immunizations or a program approved by the board; (ii) the pharmacist utilizes the Minnesota Immunization Information Connection to assess the immunization status of individuals prior to the administration of vaccines, except when administering influenza vaccines to individuals age nine and older; (iii) the pharmacist reports the administration of the immunization to the Minnesota Immunization Information Connection; (iv) if the patient is 18 years of age or younger, the pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or pharmacy intern informs the patient and any adult caregiver accompanying the patient of the importance of a well-child visit with a pediatrician or other licensed primary care provider; and (v) in the case of a pharmacy technician administering vaccinations while being supervised by a licensed pharmacist: (A) the supervision is in-person and must not be done through telehealth as defined under section 62A.673, subdivision 2; (B) the pharmacist is readily and immediately available to the immunizing pharmacy technician; (C) the pharmacy technician has a current certificate in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation; (D) the pharmacy technician has completed a minimum of two hours of ACPE-approved, immunization-related continuing pharmacy education as part of the pharmacy technician's two-year continuing education schedule; and (E) the pharmacy technician has completed one of two training programs listed under Minnesota Rules, part 6800.3850, subpart 1h, item B; (7) participation in the initiation, management, modification, and discontinuation of drug therapy according to a written protocol or collaborative practice agreement between: (i) one or more pharmacists and one or more dentists, optometrists, physicians, physician assistants, podiatrists, or veterinarians; or (ii) one or more pharmacists and one or more physician assistants authorized to prescribe, dispense, and administer under chapter 147A, or advanced practice registered nurses authorized to prescribe, dispense, and administer under section 148.235. Any changes in drug therapy made pursuant to a protocol or collaborative practice agreement must be documented by the pharmacist in the patient's medical record or reported by the pharmacist to a practitioner responsible for the patient's care; (8) participation in the storage of drugs and the maintenance of records; (9) patient counseling on therapeutic values, content, hazards, and uses of drugs and devices; (10) offering or performing those acts, services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation, management, and control of a pharmacy; (11) participation in the initiation, management, modification, and discontinuation of therapy with opiate antagonists, as defined in section 604A.04, subdivision 1, pursuant to: (i) a written protocol as allowed under clause (7); or (ii) a written protocol with a community health board medical consultant or a practitioner designated by the commissioner of health, as allowed under section 151.37, subdivision 13; (12) prescribing self-administered hormonal contraceptives; nicotine replacement medications; and opiate antagonists for the treatment of an acute opiate overdose pursuant to section 151.37, subdivision 14, 15, or 16; (13) participation in the placement of drug monitoring devices according to a prescription, protocol, or collaborative practice agreement; (14) prescribing, dispensing, and administering drugs for preventing the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) if the pharmacist meets the requirements in section 151.37, subdivision 17; and (15) ordering, conducting, and interpreting laboratory tests necessary for therapies that use drugs for preventing the acquisition of HIV, if the pharmacist meets the requirements in section 151.37, subdivision 17. Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SIRVA PREVENTION POSTER.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health to: new text end new text begin (1) create or approve a poster to educate health care personnel and the public about proper vaccine administration techniques to prevent shoulder injury related to vaccine administration (SIRVA); and new text end new text begin (2) make this poster available for display in all health care settings where vaccines are administered. new text end new text begin This is a onetime appropriation. new text end